Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-2140
Injunctions.

Whenever it appears to the director that any insurer or any director, officer, employee, or agent thereof has committed or is about to commit a violation of the Insurance Holding Company System Act or of any rule, regulation, or order of the director, the director may apply to the district court of Lancaster County for an order enjoining such insurer, director, officer, employee, or agent from violating or continuing to violate the act or any such rule, regulation, or order and for such other equitable relief as the nature of the case and the interest of the insurer's policyholders, creditors, and shareholders or the public may require.

Laws 1991, LB 236, § 20.